Indiana, session 2026, HB1066.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-22-5-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.66-2025,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) This section applies only to a state
entity.
(b) This section does not apply to the short term or temporary
lease of a vehicle.
(a) (c) As used in this section, "clean energy vehicle" means any of
the following:
(1) A vehicle that operates on one (1) or more of the following
energy sources:
(A) A rechargeable energy storage system.
(B) Hydrogen.
(C) Compressed air.
(D) Compressed or liquid natural gas.
(E) Solar energy.
(F) Liquefied petroleum gas.
(G) Methanol, denatured ethanol, and other alcohols.
HB 1066—LS 6403/DI 87


(H) Mixtures containing eighty-five percent (85%) or more by
volume of methanol, denatured ethanol, and other alcohols
with gasoline or other fuel.
(I) Natural gas.
(J) Coal-derived liquid fuels.
(K) Non-alcohol fuels derived from biological material.
(L) P-Series fuels.
(M) Electricity.
(N) Biodiesel or ultra low sulfur diesel fuel.
(2) A vehicle that operates on gasoline and one (1) or more of the
energy sources listed in subdivision (1).
(3) A vehicle that operates on diesel fuel and one (1) or more of
the energy sources listed in subdivision (1).
(b) (d) As used in this section, "state entity" means the following:
(1) A state agency.
(2) Any other authority, board, branch, commission, committee,
department, division, or other instrumentality of the executive
(including the administrative), legislative, or judicial department
of state government.
The term includes a state elected official's office and excludes a state
educational institution.
(c) (e) As used in this section, "total cost of ownership" means the
total cost of the following for a vehicle:
(1) Energy.
(2) Operations.
(3) Maintenance.
(4) Support infrastructure.
(d) (f) As used in this section, "vehicle" includes the following:
(1) An automobile.
(2) A truck.
(3) A tractor.
(e) (g) Except as provided in subsections (f) (h) and (k), (m), if a
state entity purchases or leases a vehicle, it the state entity must
purchase or lease a vehicle that satisfies both of the following:
(1) The vehicle must be a clean energy vehicle, unless the
Indiana department of administration, determines that the:
(1) (A) purchase or lease of a clean energy vehicle is
inappropriate because of the purposes for which the vehicle
will be used; or
(2) (B) total cost of ownership of a clean energy vehicle is
substantially more than the cost of a vehicle that is not a clean
energy vehicle.
HB 1066—LS 6403/DI 87


(2) The vehicle:
(A) must be a government model, base model, or standard
model vehicle; and
(B) may not be from a luxury or semi-luxury brand, if a
nonluxury brand alternative exists that uses the same
underlying vehicle platform.
(f) (h) The requirements of subsection (e) (g) do not apply to the (1)
purchase or lease of vehicles by or for:
(1) the state police department; or
(2) the governor. and
(2) short term or temporary lease of vehicles.
(g) (i) The Indiana department of administration shall adopt rules or
guidelines to provide a preference for the purchase or lease by state
entities of clean energy vehicles:
(1) manufactured wholly or partially in Indiana; or
(2) containing parts manufactured in Indiana.
(h) (j) Before August 1, each state entity shall annually submit to
the Indiana department of administration information regarding the use
of clean energy vehicles by the state entity. The information must
specify the following for the preceding state fiscal year:
(1) The amount of energy sources described in subsection (a)(1)
(c)(1) purchased by the state entity.
(2) The amount of conventional fuels purchased by the state
entity.
(3) The average price per gallon paid by the state entity for each
type of fuel purchased by the state entity.
(4) The total number of vehicles purchased or leased by the state
agency that were clean energy vehicles and the total number of
vehicles purchased or leased by the state agency that were not
clean energy vehicles.
(5) Any other information required by the Indiana department of
administration.
(i) (k) Before September 1, the Indiana department of administration
shall annually submit to the general assembly in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6 and to the governor a report that lists the information
required under subsection (h) (j) for each state entity and for all state
agencies in the aggregate.
(j) (l) Before July 1, 2025, The Indiana department of administration
shall make recommendations to state entities regarding the
procurement of clean energy vehicles.
(k) (m) A state agency may submit a request to the Indiana
department of administration, for an exception to the requirements of
HB 1066—LS 6403/DI 87


subsection (e). (g)(1). The Indiana department of administration may
grant an exception if it finds the state agency's purchase or lease of a
vehicle that does not meet the requirements of subsection (e) (g)(1) is
necessary for the state agency's intended use of the vehicle.
(n) A state entity shall dispose of a vehicle that does not comply
with subsection (g)(2) at a time and in a prudent manner as
determined by the commissioner of the department of
administration.
(o) Nothing in this section restricts a state entity from
purchasing, installing, modifying, or affixing equipment and
accessories necessary for the state entity's operational, public
safety, maintenance, or emergency response functions, regardless
of whether the equipment and accessories are installed at the time
of purchase or after.
SECTION 2. IC 5-22-5-8.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8.6. (a) This section applies only to the governmental
body of a political subdivision.
(b) This section does not apply to the short term or temporary
lease of a vehicle.
(c) As used in this section, "vehicle" includes the following:
(1) An automobile.
(2) A truck.
(3) A tractor.
The term does not include firefighting apparatus or an ambulance
owned or operated by a governmental body.
(d) If a governmental body purchases or leases a vehicle, the
vehicle:
(1) must be a government model, base model, or standard
model vehicle; and
(2) may not be from a luxury or semi-luxury brand, if a
nonluxury brand alternative exists that uses the same
underlying vehicle platform.
(e) Nothing in this section restricts a governmental body from
purchasing, installing, modifying, or affixing equipment and
accessories necessary for the governmental body's operational,
public safety, maintenance, or emergency response functions,
regardless of whether the equipment and accessories are installed
at the time of purchase or after.
HB 1066—LS 6403/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Government and Regulatory
Reform, to which was referred House Bill 1066, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
House with the recommendation that said bill be amended as follows:
Page 3, line 7, delete "(e)(1)" and insert "(g)".
Page 4, line 1, delete "(e)(1)." and insert "(g)(1).".
Page 4, line 3, delete "(e)(1)" and insert "(g)(1)".
Page 4, delete lines 5 through 6, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(n) A state entity must dispose of a vehicle that does not meet
the requirements of subsection (g)(2) not later than:
(1) July 1, 2028; or
(2) July 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in
which the vehicle reaches the end of its useful life;
whichever is later.".
Page 4, delete lines 26 through 28, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(e) A governmental body must dispose of a vehicle that does not
meet the requirements of subsection (d) not later than:
(1) July 1, 2028; or
(2) July 1 of the calendar year following the calendar year in
which the vehicle reaches the end of its useful life;
whichever is later.".
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1066 as introduced.)
MILLER D
Committee Vote: yeas 12, nays 0.
_____
HOUSE MOTION
Mr. Speaker: I move that House Bill 1066 be amended to read as
follows:
Page 4, delete lines 5 through 10, begin a new paragraph and insert:
"(n) A state entity shall dispose of a vehicle that does not comply
with subsection (g)(2) at a time and in a prudent manner as
determined by the commissioner of the department of
administration.
HB 1066—LS 6403/DI 87


(o) Nothing in this section restricts a state entity from
purchasing, installing, modifying, or affixing equipment and
accessories necessary for the state entity's operational, public
safety, maintenance, or emergency response functions, regardless
of whether the equipment and accessories are installed at the time
of purchase or after.".
Page 4, delete lines 30 through 35, begin a new paragraph and
insert:
"(e) Nothing in this section restricts a governmental body from
purchasing, installing, modifying, or affixing equipment and
accessories necessary for the governmental body's operational,
public safety, maintenance, or emergency response functions,
regardless of whether the equipment and accessories are installed
at the time of purchase or after.".
(Reference is to HB 1066 as printed January 22, 2026.)
GORE
HB 1066—LS 6403/DI 87